Maryland, session 2025, SB0550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
6–202.2.
(A) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY MAY ESTABLISH,
BY LAW, A SUBCLASS OF REAL PROPERTY CONSISTING OF REAL PROPERTY THAT:
(1) IS OWNED BY A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION; AND
(2) HAS NOT BEEN USED VACANT AND HAS NOT RECEIVED A
SIGNIFICANT IMPROVEMENT FOR AT LEAST 3 5 CONSECUTIVE TAXABLE YEARS FOR
THE PURPOSE FOR WHICH THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION WAS ESTABLISHED.
(B) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY MAY PROVIDE, BY
LAW, FOR ANY PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION, INCLUDING A
DEFINITION FOR “SIGNIFICANT IMPROVEMENT”.
6–302.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section and after complying with § 6–305
of this subtitle, in each year after the date of finality and before the following July 1, the
Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of each county annually
shall set the tax rate for the next taxable year on all assessments of property subject to that
county’s property tax.
(b) (1) Except as provided in [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (c) AND (D) of this
section and §§ 6–305 and 6–306 of this subtitle:

SENATE BILL 550 3
(i) there shall be a single county property tax rate for all real
property subject to county property tax except for operating real property described in §
8–109(c) of this article; and
(ii) the county tax rate applicable to personal property and the
operating real property described in § 8–109(c) of this article shall be no more than 2.5
times the rate for real property.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not affect a special rate prevailing
in a taxing district or part of a county.
(c) (1) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of
a county may set a special rate for a vacant lot or improved property cited as vacant and
unfit for habitation or other authorized use on a housing or building violation notice.
(2) On or before December 1 each year, the Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore City or the governing body of a county that enacts a special rate under paragraph
(1) of this subsection shall report to the Department of Housing and Community
Development and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the
General Assembly on:
(i) the special rate set under paragraph (1) of this subsection;
(ii) the number of properties to which the special rate applies;
(iii) the revenue change resulting from the special rate;
(iv) the use of the revenue from the special rate; and
(v) whether properties subject to the special rate are viable for
adaptive reuse, as defined in § 1–102 of the Housing and Community Development Article,
and plans to convert viable properties.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE MAYOR
AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY MAY SET A SPECIAL RATE FOR REAL
PROPERTY THAT:
(I) IS OWNED BY A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION; AND
(II) HAS NOT BEEN USED VACANT AND HAS NOT RECEIVED A
SIGNIFICANT IMPROVEMENT FOR AT LEAST 3 5 CONSECUTIVE TAXABLE YEARS FOR
THE PURPOSE FOR WHICH THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION WAS ESTABLISHED.
(2) THE SPECIAL RATE AUTHORIZED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY NOT EXCEED 10 TIMES THE PROPERTY TAX RATE SET UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(1)(I) OF THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 550
(D) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY MAY, BY LAW,
IMPOSE ON REAL PROPERTY THAT WOULD OTHERWISE BE EXEMPT FROM PROPERTY
TAX UNDER § 7–202 OR § 7–204 OF THIS ARTICLE THE GENERAL PROPERTY TAX RATE
SET UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1)(I) OF THIS SECTION AND THE SPECIAL RATE
AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF THIS SECTION IF THE REAL PROPERTY
IS:
(1) A VACANT LOT; OR
(2) IMPROVED PROPERTY CITED AS VACANT AND UNFIT FOR
HABITATION OR OTHER AUTHORIZED USE ON A HOUSING OR BUILDING VIOLATION
NOTICE.
7–202.
(b) (1) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section AND § 6–302(D) OF
THIS ARTICLE and subject to § 7–204.1 of this subtitle, property is not subject to property
tax if the property:
(i) is necessary for and actually used exclusively for a charitable or
educational purpose to promote the general welfare of the people of the State, including an
activity or an athletic program of an educational institution; and
(ii) is owned by:
1. a nonprofit hospital;
2. a nonprofit charitable, fraternal, educational, or literary
organization including:
A. a public library that is authorized under Title 23 of the
Education Article; and
B. a men’s or women’s club that is a nonpolitical and nonstock
club;
3. a corporation, limited liability company, or trustee that
holds the property for the sole benefit of an organization that qualifies for an exemption
under this section; or
4. a nonprofit housing corporation.
7–204.

SENATE BILL 550 5
[Subject] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 6–302(D) OF THIS ARTICLE AND SUBJECT
to § 7–204.1 of this subtitle, property that is owned by a religious group or organization is
not subject to property tax if the property is actually used exclusively for:
(1) public religious worship;
(2) a parsonage or convent; or
(3) educational purposes.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.